Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-343] Compliance with state and local
law. The issuance of special purpose revenue bonds with respect to any
project under this part shall not relieve any project party or other user of
the project from the laws, ordinances, and rules of the State or any political
subdivision thereof, or any departments or boards thereof with respect to:

(1) The construction, operation, and maintenance of
projects;

(2) Compliance with zoning laws or regulations;

(3) Obtaining of building permits; and

(4) Compliance with building and health codes and
other laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations of similar nature pertaining
to the project.

These laws shall be applicable to the party or any
other user to the same extent they would be if the costs of the project were
directly financed by the project party. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next